Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5838.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-24 of the General Laws entitled "Children With Disabilities [See
Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding
thereto the following section:
16-24-1.3. Additional procedural safeguards for English as a second language
learners and English language learners during the IEP process.
(a) When conducting an evaluation pursuant to this chapter for a child who learns as an
English as a second language (“ESL”) learner, or as an English language learner (“ELL”), school
committees, districts, and individualized education program ("IEP") teams shall consider the
English language proficiency of the student. Assessments and other evaluation materials used to
evaluate a child shall be provided and administered in the child’s primary language and in the form
most likely to yield accurate information on what the child knows and can do academically,
developmentally, and functionally. The IEP team, as defined by the regulations of the department
of elementary and secondary education, that is convened for an English learner shall include a
participant who has requisite knowledge of the student’s language needs and shall also include
participants with training and expertise in second language acquisition and an understanding of
how to differentiate between the student’s limited English proficiency and the student’s disability.
Whenever an evaluation indicates that a child who is an English learner is also a school aged child
with a disability, the IEP team shall ensure that the IEP includes services to meet both the English
language and special education needs of the child.

(b) School districts shall not recommend that parents decline all or some services within
an English learner program for any reason, including facilitating scheduling of special education
services or other scheduling reasons.
(c) The department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) shall ensure
meaningful communication between school personnel and parents and legal guardians of all
students receiving educational services pursuant to this chapter. The department shall ensure that
interpreters and translators used in public school settings are bilingual, have knowledge in both
languages of any specialized terms or concepts to be used in the communication at issue, and that
interpreters are trained on the role of an interpreter and translator, the ethics of interpreting and
translating, and the need to maintain confidentiality.
(d) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of
this section including, but not limited, to addressing any academic deficits resulting from focusing
on English language acquisition within a reasonable amount of time. The department shall also
promulgate regulations to continue in effect and enforce the provisions of 20 USC §1415(k) in
effect on January 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001574
========
LC001574 - Page 2 of 3